Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
84-414
Survey Record
Repository Fund; created; use; investment.

The
State Surveyor, under the direction of the Board of Educational Lands and
Funds, shall receive and account for all money derived from the operation
of the survey record repository pursuant to sections 84-412 and 84-413, and
shall pay such money to the State Treasurer, who shall credit it to the Survey
Record Repository Fund which is hereby created. When appropriated by the Legislature,
this fund shall be expended only for the purposes of sections 84-412 and 84-413, except that transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
All money in the Survey Record Repository Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 17;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 146;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 91.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.